src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON VNAME_INFL
 +Sg+Nom:          FINAL1 ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:       RHyph  ; 
 +Cmp/SgGen:       RHyph  ; 
 +Sg+Acc:%>m       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>n       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>se      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ine:%>sne     FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ela:%>ste     FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Com:%>jne     FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>h       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>jde     FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>j       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>jde     FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ine:%>jne     FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ela:%>jste    FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com:%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>jgyjmie FINAL1 ;
    +Ess:%>jne     FINAL1 ;
   +Attr:          FINAL1 ;
!SNAME_NIEJTE ; ! Even syllable as default - rename using either ERVASTI, or
! the appropriate even syllable lexicons.


! This lexicon not in use until we get an
! answer from SGM
! LEXICON VNAME_PLC-ORG
!  +Sg+Nom:          FINAL1 ;
!            RHyph ;
!  +Sg+Acc:%>m       FINAL1 ;
!  +Sg+Gen:%>n       FINAL1 ;
!  +Sg+Ill:%>se      FINAL1 ;
!  +Sg+Ine:%>sne     FINAL1 ;
!  +Sg+Ela:%>ste     FINAL1 ;
!  +Sg+Com:%>jne      FINAL1 ;
!  +Ess:%>jne         FINAL1 ;
!  +Attr: FINAL1 ;

!SNAME_NIEJTE ; ! Even syllable as default - rename using either ERVASTI, or
! the appropriate even syllable lexicons.

LEXICON NYSTØ-plc ! placename
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NYSTØ_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: NYSTØ_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON NYSTØ_MWE-plc ! placename
NYSTØ-plc ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-org ! organisasjon
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: NYSTØ_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

!LEXICON NYSTØ-femsur
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: NYSTØDECL_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NYSTØDECL_FLAG ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-sur ! etternavn
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: NYSTØDECL_FLAG ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-obj ! objekt, pluto, jupiter
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: NYSTØDECL_FLAG ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-mal ! John
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NYSTØDECL_FLAG ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-fem ! kvinnenavn
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NYSTØDECL_FLAG ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-org ! organisasjon
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: NYSTØ-LOAN ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-plc ! stedsnavn
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NYSTØ-LOAN ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: NYSTØ-LOAN ;

!LEXICON NYSTØ ! Utan semantisk tag
! +N+Prop: NYSTØDECL_FLAG ;


!LEXICON NYSTØ-ani
!+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: NYSTØDECL_FLAG ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN
!+Err/Orth: NYSTØDECL_FLAG ; ! must evt. be +Use/NotSpeller etc.
!+Sg+Nom:          FINAL1 ; ! must evt. be +Use/NotSpeller etc.
   NYSTØDECL_FLAG ;


LEXICON NYSTØDECL_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØDECL ;
LEXICON NYSTØDECL ! Names ending in stressed vowel, typically scand. compounds
   +Attr: FINAL1      ;
          RHyph       ;
     +Pl: NIEJTE_PL   ;
          EVEN_ESS    ;
     +Sg: NIEJTESGOBL ;
 +Sg+Nom: FINAL1      ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:n FINAL1      ; !Norm? se epost til Maja 20.9.2019

LEXICON NYSTØ_PLC-ORG_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ_PLC-ORG ;
LEXICON NYSTØ_PLC-ORG ! Names ending in stressed vowel, typically scand. compounds
   +Attr: FINAL1      ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RHyph  ; 
+Cmp/SgGen: RHyph  ; 
!+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
          EVEN_ESS    ;
     +Sg: NIEJTESGOBL ;
 +Sg+Nom: FINAL1      ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:n FINAL1      ; !Norm? se epost til Maja 20.9.2019

LEXICON LONDON-atr
 +N+Prop+Attr: FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Cmp/SgNom: RHyph  ;
 +N+Prop+Cmp/SgGen: RHyph  ;

LEXICON LONDON-obj  !!= @CODE@  Objects. ODD-syllable
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;
 
!!€gt-norm: Windows # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Windows:                Windows+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Attr
!!€ Windows:                Windows+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom
!!€ Windowsasse:            Windows+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill
!!€ Windowsistie:           Windows+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela

LEXICON LONDON-orgplc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON LONDON-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON LONDON-orgsur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON LONDON-malplc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;


LEXICON LONDON-mal
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;

LEXICON LONDON-malfem
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;

LEXICON LONDON-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON LONDON_MWE-plc
LONDON-plc ;

LEXICON LONDON-fem
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;


LEXICON LONDON-malsur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;

LEXICON LONDON-sur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;

LEXICON LONDON-ani
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;
 
 
LEXICON LONDONBERN-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 

LEXICON DUORTNUS-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: RHyph  ;

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Org: RHyph  ;

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: RHyph  ;


!LEXICON BETFAGE-fem
!  PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ;
!
!LEXICON BETFAGE-mal
!  PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ;
!
!LEXICON BETFAGE-plc
!  SNAME_NIEJTE-plc ;

LEXICON BERN-ani
   CNAME_EVEN-ani ;

LEXICON BERN-surmal
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ;

LEXICON BERN-sur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ;


LEXICON BERN-mal
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj GÅATETJE          ; ! Trondetje


LEXICON BERN-objsur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ;

LEXICON BERN-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ;

LEXICON BERN-fem
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:@U.Cap.Obl@e%»tj GÅATETJE ;

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: RHyph  ;

!LEXICON BERN-femplc
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG    ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON BERN-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ; ! reverting the special LOAN lexicon,
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Org: RHyph  ; ! it only gives nominative.

LEXICON BERN-orgsur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG         ;

LEXICON OY-fem
BERN-fem ;
 
LEXICON OY-sur
BERN-sur ;

LEXICON OY-plc
BERN-plc ;

!LEXICON BERN-surplc
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;


LEXICON BERN-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON BERN_MWE-plc
BERN-plc ;

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ; ! reverting the special LOAN lexicon,
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: RHyph  ; ! it only gives nominative.

LEXICON RONDANE-LOAN
+N+Prop:   ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ; ! reverting the special LOAN lexicon,
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: RHyph  ; ! it only gives nominative.

LEXICON RONDANE-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:   ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_FLAG ;

LEXICON RONDANE-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:   ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_FLAG ;

LEXICON RONDANE-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:   ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON RONDANE-SG-LOAN
+N+Prop:   ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ; ! reverting the special LOAN lexicon,
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: RHyph  ; ! it only gives nominative.

LEXICON RONDANE-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:   ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_FLAG ;

LEXICON RONDANE-fem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:   ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_FLAG ;

LEXICON RONDANE-SG-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:   ERVASTI_NO_DISIMPH_FLAG ;
