src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Aasebø:Aase^bø NYSTØ-sur ;
Allingåbro:Alling^å^bro NYSTØ-plc ;
Andeby:Ande^by NYSTØ-plc ;
Andre:Andre NYSTØ-mal ; 
André:André NYSTØ-mal ;
Ann-Mari:Ann-Mari NYSTØ-fem ;
Anne-Mari:Anne-Mari NYSTØ-fem ;
Anneli:Anne^li NYSTØ-fem ;
Ansamaa:Ansamaa NYSTØ-sur ;
Asunmaa:Asun^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Austvågøy:Aust^våg^øy NYSTØ-plc ;
Baby:Baby NYSTØ-obj ;
Bismo:Bismo NYSTØ-plc ;
Bjørndalstræ:Bjørndals^træ NYSTØ-plc ;
Bo+CmpN/None:Bo NYSTØ-mal ;
Borkamo:Borka^mo NYSTØ-plc ;
Bratli:Brat^li NYSTØ-sur ;
Brattli:Bratt^li NYSTØ-sur ;
Bråtå:Bråt^å NYSTØ-plc ;
Bøylefossbru:Bøyle^foss^bru NYSTØ-plc ;
Che:Che NYSTØ-mal ; 
Chou:Chou NYSTØ-mal ;
Daa:Daa NYSTØ-sur ;
Dalby:Dal^by NYSTØ-plc ;
Dey:Dey NYSTØ-sur ;
Echbo:Ech^bo NYSTØ-sur ;
Egeli:Ege^li NYSTØ-plc ;
Engø:Eng^ø NYSTØ-plc ;
Esau:Esau NYSTØ-mal ;
Finnøy:Finn^øy NYSTØ-plc ;
Finslo:Finslo NYSTØ-sur ;
Flø:Flø NYSTØ-plc ;
Frederiksø:Frederiks^ø NYSTØ-plc ;
Försti:För^sti NYSTØ-sur ;
Girardeau:Girardeau NYSTØ-plc ;
Glarbo:Glarbo NYSTØ-sur ;
Granly:Gran^ly NYSTØ-sur ;
Gro:Gro NYSTØ-fem ;
Gry:Gry NYSTØ-fem ;
Guangzhou:Gu^angzhou NYSTØ-plc ;
Gulli:Gulli NYSTØ-sur ;
Halbo:Halbo NYSTØ-sur ;
Hallingby:Halling^by NYSTØ-plc ;
Hangasmaa:Hangas^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Haukøy:Hauk^øy NYSTØ-plc ;
Hemingway:Heming^way NYSTØ-sur ;
Hillesøy:Hilles^øy NYSTØ-plc ;
Ho+CmpN/None:Ho NYSTØ-mal ; 
Hoë:Hoë NYSTØ-sur ;
Husabø:Husa^bø NYSTØ-plc ;
Hønseby:Hønse^by NYSTØ-plc ;
Høy:Høy NYSTØ-sur ;
Hülegü:Hülegü NYSTØ-mal ;
Jiangxi:Ji^ang^xi NYSTØ-plc ;
Jiu:Jiu NYSTØ-mal ;
Jo+CmpN/None:Jo NYSTØ-mal ; 
Kangasmaa:Kangas^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Karhapää:Karha^pää NYSTØ-plc ;
Karjanmaa:Karjan^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Kehusmaa:Kehus^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Killi:Killi NYSTØ-sur ;
Kim-Andre:Kim-Andre NYSTØ-mal ; 
Kitaa:Kitaa NYSTØ-plc ;
Kivimaa:Kivi^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Korkee:Korkee NYSTØ-sur ;
Kornsjø:Korn^sjø NYSTØ-plc ;
Koskimaa:Koski^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Krøkmo:Krøk^mo NYSTØ-plc ;
Kylmämaa:Kylmä^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Landrø:Land^rø NYSTØ-sur ;
Langmo:Lang^mo NYSTØ-plc ;
Lau:Lau NYSTØ-sur ;
Lehtimaa:Lehti^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Li+CmpN/None:Li NYSTØ-sur ; 
Liinamaa:Liina^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Lillebø:Lille^bø NYSTØ-plc ;
Linn-Mari:Linn-Mari NYSTØ-fem ;
Lisa-Mari:Lisa-Mari NYSTØ-fem ;
Liu:Liu NYSTØ-mal ;
Lyngby:Lyng^by NYSTØ-plc ;
Lähteenmaa:Lähteen^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Mandø:Mand^ø NYSTØ-plc ;
Mannermaa:Manner^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Mari:Mari NYSTØ-fem ;
Marjomaa:Marjo^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Mey:Mey NYSTØ-org ;
Moldau:Moldau NYSTØ-plc ;
Moltzau:Moltzau NYSTØ-sur ;
Mäkimaa:Mäki^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Mågerø:Måger^ø NYSTØ-plc ;
Nesbø:Nesbø NYSTØ-sur ;
Nescafé:Nes^café NYSTØ-obj ;
Nestlé:Nestlé NYSTØ-org ;
Nevanpää:Nevan^pää NYSTØ-plc ;
Niemimaa:Niemi^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Niittymaa:Niitty^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Nordraa:Nord^raa NYSTØ-sur ;
Norøy:Nor^øy NYSTØ-plc ;
Ohtamaa:Ohtamaa NYSTØ-sur ;
Onøy:On^øy NYSTØ-plc ;
Orrenmaa:Orren^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Perämaa:Perä^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Po+CmpN/None:Po NYSTØ-mal ; 
Præstø:Præst^ø NYSTØ-plc ;
Pyy:Pyy NYSTØ-obj ;
Rantamaa:Ranta^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Rene:Rene NYSTØ-fem ; 
RiTø:RiTø NYSTØ-org ;
RiTø:Ri^Tø NYSTØ-org ;
Rognmo:Rogn^mo NYSTØ-plc ;
Rugby:Rugby NYSTØ-obj ;
Rødekro:Røde^kro NYSTØ-obj ;
Rømo:Rømo NYSTØ-sur ;
SATø:SATø NYSTØ-org ;
SATø:SA^Tø NYSTØ-org ;
Sagebø:Sage^bø NYSTØ-plc ;
Satomaa:Sato^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Seløy:Sel^øy NYSTØ-plc ;
Skamo:Skamo NYSTØ-sur ;
Skogmo:Skog^mo NYSTØ-plc ;
Sky:Sky NYSTØ-org ;
Sparby:Spar^by NYSTØ-plc ;
Steinway:Stein^way NYSTØ-sur ;
Storselsøy:Stor^sels^øy NYSTØ-plc ;
Sureflo:Sure^flo NYSTØ-org ;
Svorkmo:Svork^mo NYSTØ-plc ;
Sørfugløy:Sør^fugl^øy NYSTØ-plc ;
The:The NYSTØ-fem ; 
Thy:Thy NYSTØ-sur ;
Tobru:To^bru NYSTØ-plc ;
Tuskegee:Tuskegee NYSTØ-plc ;
Ty+CmpN/None:Ty NYSTØ-mal ; 
Tyynismaa:Tyynis^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
UiTø:Ui^Tø NYSTØ-org ;
Valø:Val^ø NYSTØ-plc ;
Vestby:Vest^by NYSTØ-plc ;
Viderø:Vider^ø NYSTØ-org ;
Vierimaa:Vieri^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Viðoy:Við^oy NYSTØ-plc ;
Vo+CmpN/None:Vo NYSTØ-mal ; 
Vuorimaa:Vuori^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Wenzhou:Wenzhou NYSTØ-plc ;
Yrttimaa:Yrtti^maa NYSTØ-sur ;
Zhou:Zhou NYSTØ-mal ;
Åbenrå:Åbenrå NYSTØ-plc ;
Ærø:Ær^ø NYSTØ-plc ;
Harrsjön:Harr^sjö NYSTØ-plc ;
